Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. ORGANIZATION OF MUNICIPAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE A. TYPES OF MUNICIPALITIES

CHAPTER 9. HOME-RULE MUNICIPALITY

Sec. 9.001. ADOPTION OR AMENDMENT OF HOME-RULE CHARTER. This chapter applies to the adoption or amendment of a municipal charter by a municipality authorized to do so by Article XI, Section 5, of the Texas Constitution.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 9.0015. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "climate charter" means a charter provision or charter amendment establishing a comprehensive rule or policy statement that purports to address climate change or the municipality's environmental impact, including water and energy use and air pollution.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 360 (S.B. 1860), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 9.002. SELECTION OF CHARTER COMMISSION. (a) The governing body of the municipality may, by an ordinance adopted by at least a two-thirds vote of its membership, order an election by the voters of the municipality on the question: "Shall a commission be chosen to frame a new charter?" The governing body shall by ordinance order the election if presented with a petition signed by at least 10 percent of the qualified voters of the municipality.

(b) The election ordinance shall provide for the election to be held on the date of the municipality's next general election scheduled after the 30th day but on or before the 90th day after the date the ordinance is adopted. However, if no general election is scheduled during that period that allows sufficient time to comply with other requirements of law, the election shall be ordered for the first authorized uniform election date prescribed by the Election Code that allows sufficient time to comply with other requirements of law and that occurs after the 30th day after the date the ordinance is adopted and published in a newspaper published in the municipality.

(c) The ballot at the election on the question prescribed by Subsection (a) shall also provide for the election from the municipality at large of a charter commission to draft a charter if a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question of choosing a charter commission approve the question. The commission must consist of at least 15 members, but if it has more than 15 members it may not have more than one member for each 3,000 inhabitants of the municipality. The ballot may not contain any party designation.

(d) The provisions of Subsections (a), (b), and (c) regarding the selection of a charter commission do not apply to the first charter election in a municipality if:

(1)(A) the governing body of the municipality selects a charter commission;

(B) a charter commission is selected at a mass meeting; or

(C) the mayor of the municipality appoints a charter commission; and

(2) the charter commission has proceeded with the formation of a charter for the municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 9.003. VOTE ON CHARTER. (a) Except as provided by Section 9.0045, the charter prepared by the charter commission shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the municipality at an election to be held on the first authorized uniform election date prescribed by the Election Code that allows sufficient time to comply with other requirements of law and that occurs on or after the 40th day after the date the charter commission completes its work. The governing body of the municipality shall provide for the submission of the charter at the election to the extent that the provisions for submission are not prescribed by general law.

(b) Before the 30th day before the date of the election, the governing body of the municipality shall order the municipal clerk or the municipal secretary to mail a copy of the proposed charter to each registered voter of the municipality.

(c) The charter commission shall prepare the charter so that to the extent practicable each subject may be voted on separately.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 87(b), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 360 (S.B. 1860), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 9.004. CHARTER AMENDMENTS. (a) Except as provided by Section 9.0045, the governing body of a municipality on its own motion may submit a proposed charter amendment to the municipality's qualified voters for their approval at an election. The governing body shall submit a proposed charter amendment to the voters for their approval at an election if the submission is supported by a petition signed by a number of qualified voters of the municipality equal to at least five percent of the number of qualified voters of the municipality or 20,000, whichever number is the smaller.

(b) The ordinance ordering the election shall provide for the election to be held on the first authorized uniform election date prescribed by the Election Code or on the earlier of the date of the next municipal general election or presidential general election. The election date must allow sufficient time to comply with other requirements of law and must occur on or after the 30th day after the date the ordinance is adopted.

(c) Notice of the election shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation published in the municipality. The notice must:

(1) include a substantial copy of the proposed amendment;

(2) include an estimate of the anticipated fiscal impact to the municipality if the proposed amendment is approved at the election; and

(3) be published on the same day in each of two successive weeks, with the first publication occurring before the 14th day before the date of the election.

(d) An amendment may not contain more than one subject.

(e) The ballot shall be prepared so that a voter may approve or disapprove any one or more amendments without having to approve or disapprove all of the amendments.

(f) The requirement imposed by Subsection (c)(2) does not waive governmental immunity for any purpose and a person may not seek injunctive relief or any other judicial remedy to enforce the estimate of the anticipated fiscal impact on the municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1219, Sec. 5, eff. June 20, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 76, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 414 (S.B. 1086), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 360 (S.B. 1860), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 9.0045. APPROVAL OF CLIMATE CHARTER OR AMENDMENT TO CHARTER BY LEGISLATURE REQUIRED. A municipality may not hold an election for voter approval of a proposed climate charter unless the legislature adopts a resolution approving the proposed climate charter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 360 (S.B. 1860), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 9.005. ADOPTION OF CHARTER OR AMENDMENT. (a) A proposed charter for a municipality or a proposed amendment to a municipality's charter is adopted if it is approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the municipality who vote at an election held for that purpose.

(b) A charter or an amendment does not take effect until the governing body of the municipality enters an order in the records of the municipality declaring that the charter or amendment is adopted.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 9.006. CONCURRENT ELECTIONS. This chapter does not prevent the voters at an election to adopt a charter or an amendment to a charter from electing at the same election persons to hold office under the charter or amendment.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 9.007. CERTIFICATION OF CHARTER OR AMENDMENT. (a) As soon as practicable after a municipality adopts a charter or charter amendment, the mayor or chief executive officer of the municipality shall certify to the secretary of state an authenticated copy of the charter or amendment under the municipality's seal showing the approval by the voters of the municipality.

(b) The secretary of state shall file and record the certification in his office in a book kept for that purpose.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 9.008. REGISTRATION OF CHARTER OR AMENDMENT; EFFECT. (a) The secretary or other officer of a municipality performing functions similar to those of a secretary shall record in the secretary's or other officer's office a charter or charter amendment adopted by the voters of the municipality. If a charter or amendment is not recorded on microfilm, as may be permitted under another law, it shall be recorded in a book kept for that purpose.

(b) Recorded charters or amendments are public acts. Courts shall take judicial notice of them, and no proof is required of their provisions.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.